test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-hilgod_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - hilgođ: # ML checked

    hilgođ+V+Inf: hilgođ
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: hilguđ
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hilguum
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: hilguuh
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hilgoo
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: hilgojeen
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: hilguuvettee
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: hilguv
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: hilgup
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: hilguuvetteđ
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: hilgojeh
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: hilgojim
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: hilgojih
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: hilgui
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: hilguim
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: hilguid
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: hilguin
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: hilguim
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: hilguid
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: hilgojii
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: hilguuččim
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: hilguuččih
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: hilguuččij
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: hilguuččáim
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: hilguuččáid
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: hilguuččáin
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: hilguuččijm
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: hilguuččijd
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: hilguuččii
#    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: hilguužeem
#    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: hilguužeeh
##    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: hilguš
#    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: hilguužeen
#    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: hilgušvettee
#    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: hilguužává
#    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: hilguužep
#    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: hilgušvetteđ
#    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: hilguužeh
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: hilguu
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: hilgum
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: hilguuččii
#    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: hilguužii
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrsPrc: [hilgojeijee, hilgojijjee]
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: hilgum
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Nom: hilgum
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ess: hilguumin
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Loc: hilguumist
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ill: hilguumân
    hilgođ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: hilguuhánnáá
    hilgođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hilgodâm
    hilgođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: hilgodah
    hilgođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hilgood
    hilgođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: hilgodeen
    hilgođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: hilgoodvettee
    hilgođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: hilgodává
    hilgođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: hilgodeh
    hilgođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: hilgood
    hilgođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: hilgodim
    hilgođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: hilgodij
    hilgođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: hilgodii
    hilgođ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: hilgodiččim
    hilgođ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: hilgodičij
    hilgođ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: hilgodižžeem
    hilgođ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: hilgodiš
    hilgođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: hilgood
    hilgođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: hilgodâm
    hilgođ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: hilgodižžii
    hilgođ+V+Der/d+V+PrfPrc: hilgodâm
    hilgođ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: hilgoodhánnáá
    hilgođ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Nom: hilgodem
    hilgođ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ill: hilgoodmân
    hilgođ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ess: hilgoodmin
    hilgođ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Loc: hilgoodmist
    hilgođ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com: hilgooddijn
    hilgođ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg1: hilgooddijnân
    hilgođ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg2: hilgooddijnâd
    hilgođ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg3: hilgooddijnis
    hilgođ+V+Der/d+V+Ger: hilgooddijn
    hilgođ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hilgostâm
    hilgođ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hilgottâm
    hilgođ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hilgoškuáđám
